Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.075

Breach of recognizance conditions.

In case of the breach of the conditions of any such recognizance, the same proceedings shall be had that are by law prescribed in relation to recognizances to keep the peace.

[Code 1881 s 1122; 1873 p 242 s 280; 1854 p 123 s 144; RRS s 2203. Formerly RCW 10.64.070, part.]